Utah statutes.
58-9-704.   Interest earned on trust funds.

Interest earned on trust funds shall be available for expenditure according to the following priority:

(1)  to pay the reasonable trustee expenses of administering the trust within a maximum amount established by rule;

(2)  to pay within a maximum amount established by rule under Section 58-9-504 the reasonable provider expenses associated with:

(a)  the sale of the plan;

(b)  administering the collection, remittance, and accounting of the amount of payments made into the corpus of the trust; and

(c)  reporting required with respect to those contracts:

(i)  that have been sold; and

(ii)  under which the provider is obligated;

(3)  to pay the costs of providing any of the following for which the provider is obligated under a specific outstanding preneed funeral arrangement contract:

(a)  personal property; and

(b)  services at need; and

(4)  to pay the provider available funds left in the individual trust account after:

(a)  all costs of providing personal property and services for which the provider is obligated under the contract underlying the trust; or

(b) (i)  the contract is canceled as provided under this chapter; and

(ii)  all amounts payable to the buyer, beneficiary, or any other person have been paid in full.



Enacted by Chapter 49, 2003 General Session

